Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 45 FAIR CAMPAIGN PRACTICES ACT
1-45-111. Duties of the secretary of state - enforcement. (Repealed)

Source:

Initiated 96:

Entire article R&RE, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, January 15, 1997.

L. 2000:

(1)(a.5) added and (1)(b) and (2) amended, p. 126, § 8, effective March 15; (2)(d) added, p. 1725, § 3, effective June 1.

Initiated 2002:

Entire section repealed, effective upon proclamation of the Governor (see editor's note, (2)).

1-45-111.5. Duties of the secretary of state - enforcement - sanctions - definitions.

The secretary of state shall promulgate such rules, in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., as may be necessary to enforce and administer any provision of this article.

(1.5) (a) Any person who believes that a violation of article XXVIII of the state constitution, the secretary of state's rules concerning campaign and political finance, or this article 45 has occurred may file a written complaint with the secretary of state in accordance with section 1-45-111.7.

Any person who commits a violation of either the secretary of state's rules concerning campaign and political finance or this article that is not specifically listed in article XXVIII of the state constitution shall be subject to any of the sanctions specified in section 10 of article XXVIII of the state constitution or in this section.

In addition to any other penalty authorized by article XXVIII of the state constitution or this article 45, a hearing officer may impose a civil penalty of fifty dollars per day for each day that a report, statement, or other document required to be filed under this article 45 that is not specifically listed in article XXVIII of the state constitution is not filed by the close of business on the day due. Any person who fails to file three or more successive committee registration reports or reports concerning contributions, expenditures, or donations in accordance with the requirements of section 1-45-107.5 shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to five hundred dollars for each day that a report, statement, or other document required to be filed by an independent expenditure committee is not filed by the close of business on the day due. Any person who knowingly and intentionally fails to file three or more reports due under section 1-45-107.5 shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars per day for each day that the report, statement, or other document is not filed by the close of business on the day due. Imposition of any penalty under this subsection (1.5)(c) shall be subject to all applicable requirements specified in section 10 of article XXVIII of the state constitution governing the imposition of penalties.

In connection with a complaint brought to enforce any requirement of article XXVIII of the state constitution or this article 45, a hearing officer may order disclosure of the source and amount of any undisclosed donations or expenditures.

In connection with any action brought to enforce any provision of article XXVIII of the state constitution or this article 45, the membership lists of a membership organization, a labor organization or, in the case of a publicly held corporation, a list of the shareholders of the corporation, shall not be disclosed by means of discovery or by any other manner.

Any person who is fined up to one thousand dollars per day for a knowing and intentional failure to file under paragraph (c) of this subsection (1.5) shall, if the person has shareholders or members, notify such shareholders or members of the penalty and the adjudicated violations on its publicly accessible website in a prominent manner for not less than one hundred eighty days after the final adjudication. A copy of this notice, with the website address used, shall be filed with the secretary of state and shall be a public record.

The secretary of state has, as a matter of right, the right to intervene in any action pending before the office of administrative courts or the court of appeals that is brought to enforce the provisions of article XXVIII of the state constitution or this article.

A party in any action brought to enforce the provisions of article XXVIII of the state constitution or of this article 45 is entitled to the recovery of the party's reasonable attorney fees and costs from any attorney or party who has brought or defended the action, either in whole or in part, upon a determination by the hearing officer that the action, or any part thereof, lacked substantial justification or that the action, or any part thereof, was commenced for delay or harassment or if it finds that an attorney or party unnecessarily expanded the proceeding by other improper conduct, including abuses of discovery procedures available under the Colorado rules of civil procedure. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection (2), no attorney fees may be awarded under this subsection (2) unless the court or hearing officer, as applicable, has first considered and issued written findings regarding the provisions of section 13-17-102 (5) and (6). Either party in an action in which the hearing officer awarded attorney fees and costs may apply to a district court to convert an award of attorney fees and costs into a district court judgment. Promptly upon the conversion of the award of attorney fees and costs into a district court judgment, the clerk of the district court shall mail notice of the filing of the judgment to the judgment debtor at the address given and shall make a note of the mailing in the docket. The notice must include the name and post-office address of the judgment creditor and the judgment creditor's lawyer, if any, in this state. In addition, the judgment creditor may mail a notice of the filing of the judgment to the judgment debtor and may file proof of mailing with the clerk. Lack of mailing notice of filing by the clerk shall not affect the enforcement proceedings if proof of mailing by the judgment creditor has been filed. For purposes of this subsection (2), "lacked substantial justification" means substantially frivolous, substantially groundless, or substantially vexatious.

Upon a determination by the hearing officer that an issue committee failed to file a report required pursuant to section 1-45-108, the hearing officer shall direct the issue committee to file any such report within ten days containing all required disclosure of any previously unreported contributions or expenditures and may, in addition to any other penalty, impose a penalty not to exceed twenty dollars for each contribution received and expenditure made by the issue committee that was not timely reported.

Upon failure of a witness or party to comply with an administrative subpoena issued in relation to an alleged campaign finance violation pursuant to article XXVIII of the state constitution or this article, the party that requested the administrative subpoena or the issuing agency may petition the district court ex parte with a copy of the petition sent to the subpoenaed witness or party and the administrative law judge by regular mail, for an order directing the witness or party to comply with the administrative subpoena.

If the petition required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shows to the district court's satisfaction that the administrative subpoena was properly served pursuant to rule 4 of the Colorado rules of civil procedure, the district court shall order the subpoenaed witness or party to appear before the district court and show cause why the witness or party should not be ordered to comply with the administrative subpoena. A copy of the petition and the court order shall be served, pursuant to rule 5 of the Colorado rules of civil procedure, on the witness or party at least fifteen days before the date designated for the witness or party to appear before the district court.

At a show cause hearing ordered by the district court pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (4), the court shall review the administrative subpoena and any evidence presented by the parties to determine compliance with the Colorado rules of civil procedure. The subpoenaed witness or party shall bear the burden of showing good cause as to why he or she should not be ordered to comply with the administrative subpoena.

If the court determines that the subpoenaed witness or party is required to comply with the administrative subpoena:

The district court shall order compliance forthwith and may impose remedial and punitive fines, including attorneys' fees and costs, for the witness's or party's failure to comply with the administrative subpoena; and

The hearing officer shall schedule a hearing on the complaint to occur on a day after the occurrence of the required deposition and such other discovery as may be warranted due to such deposition.

If the subpoenaed witness or party fails to appear at the show cause hearing, the district court may issue a bench warrant for the arrest of the subpoenaed witness or party and may impose other sanctions pursuant to the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 2160, § 6, effective June 3.

L. 2005:

(2) amended, p. 852, § 4, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(1.5) added and (2) amended, p. 349, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2010:

(1.5)(c), (1.5)(d), (1.5)(e), and (1.5)(f) added, (SB 10-203), ch. 269, p. 1236, § 6, effective May 25; (3) added, (HB 10-1370), ch. 270, p. 1242, § 7, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2011:

(4) added, (HB 11-1117), ch. 35, p. 97, § 1, effective March 21.

L. 2016:

(5) added, (SB 16-106), ch. 290, p. 1175, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

(1.5)(a) and (2) amended and (1.5)(g) added, (HB 18-1047), ch. 155, p. 1095, § 7, effective April 23.

L. 2019:

(1.5)(a) to (1.5)(e), (2), (3), and (4)(d)(II) amended and (5) repealed, (SB 19-232), ch. 330, p. 3066, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

In

Holland v. Williams

, 457 F. Supp. 3d 979 (D. Colo. 2018), the United States District Court for the District of Colorado held that the enforcement provisions in article XXVIII, section 9(2)(a), of the state constitution and subsection (1.5)(a) of this section are facially unconstitutional under the first and fourteenth amendments to the United States Constitution.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act adding subsections (1.5)(c), (1.5)(d), (1.5)(e), and (1.5)(f), see section 1 of chapter 269, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

(2) For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act adding subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 270, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

1-45-111.7. Campaign finance complaints - initial review - curing violations - investigation and enforcement - hearings - advisory opinions - document review - collection of debts resulting from campaign finance penalties - definitions.

Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Article XXVIII" means article XXVIII of the state constitution.

"Deputy secretary" means the deputy secretary of state appointed pursuant to section 24-21-105 or the deputy secretary's designee.

"Division" means the division within the office of the secretary responsible for administering the state's laws governing campaign and political finance.

"Hearing officer" means a person authorized to conduct a hearing under section 24-4-105 (3).

"Rules" means the rules of the secretary concerning campaign and political finance.

"Secretary" means the secretary of state or the secretary's designate.

Filing complaints.

Any person who believes that a violation has occurred of article XXVIII, this article 45, or the rules may file a complaint with the secretary.

A complaint must be filed no later than one hundred eighty days after the date on which the complainant either knew or should have known, by the exercise of reasonable diligence, of the alleged violation.

Any complaint must be filed in writing and signed by the complainant on the form provided by the secretary. The complaint must identify one or more respondents and include the information required to be provided on the form.

Upon receipt of a complaint, the division shall notify the respondent of the complaint by e-mail or by regular mail if e-mail is unavailable.

The division shall forward any complaint made against a candidate for secretary or the secretary to the department of law for the review of the complaint by the attorney general to act on behalf of the division in accordance with applicable requirements of this section.

Initial review.

The division shall conduct an initial review of a complaint filed under subsection (2) of this section to determine whether the complaint:

Was timely filed under subsection (2)(b) of this section;

Specifically identifies one or more violations of article XXVIII, this article 45, or the rules; and

Alleges sufficient facts to support a factual and legal basis for the violations of law alleged in the complaint.

Within ten business days of receiving a complaint, the division shall take one or more of the actions specified in this subsection (3)(b):

If the division makes an initial determination that the complaint was not timely filed, has not specifically identified one or more violations of article XXVIII, this article 45, or the rules, or does not assert facts sufficient to support a factual or legal basis for an alleged violation, the division shall prepare and file with the deputy secretary a motion to dismiss the complaint. The deputy secretary shall make a determination on the motion to dismiss within five business days, which must be provided to the complainant and the respondent by e-mail or by regular mail if e-mail is unavailable. If the deputy secretary denies the motion, the division shall determine whether to conduct a review under subsection (3)(b)(II) or (3)(b)(III) of this section. The final determination by the deputy secretary on the motion to dismiss constitutes final agency action and is subject to judicial review by a state district court under section 24-4-106.

If the division makes an initial determination that the complaint alleges one or more curable violations as addressed in subsection (4) of this section, the division shall notify the respondent and provide the respondent an opportunity to cure the violations.

If the division makes an initial determination that the complaint has specifically identified one or more violations of article XXVIII, this article 45, or the rules, and has alleged facts sufficient to support a factual or legal basis for each alleged violation, and that either a factual finding or a legal interpretation is required, the division shall conduct additional review under subsection (5) of this section within thirty days to determine whether to file a complaint with a hearing officer.

Curing violations.

Upon the division's initial determination that a complaint alleges a failure to file or otherwise disclose required information, or alleges another curable violation, the division shall notify the respondent by e-mail or by regular mail if e-mail is unavailable of the curable deficiencies alleged in the complaint.

The respondent has ten business days from the date the notice is e-mailed or mailed to file an amendment to any relevant report that cures any deficiencies specified in the notice.

The respondent shall provide the division with notice of the respondent's intent to cure on the form provided by the secretary and include a copy of any amendments to any report containing one or more deficiencies.

Upon receipt of the respondent's notice of an intent to cure, the division may ask the respondent to provide additional information and may grant the respondent an extension of time to file an amended notice of intent to cure in order to respond to any such request.

After the period for cure has expired, the division shall determine whether the respondent has cured any violation alleged in the complaint and, if so, whether the respondent has substantially complied with its legal obligations under article XXVIII, this article 45, and the rules in accordance with subsection (4)(f) of this section.

If the division determines that the respondent has substantially complied with its legal obligations, the division shall prepare and file with the deputy secretary a motion to dismiss the complaint. The motion must be accompanied by a draft order specifying the manner in which the respondent has satisfied the factors specified in subsection (4)(f) of this section. The deputy secretary shall make a determination on the motion to dismiss, which must be provided to the complainant and the respondent by e-mail or by regular mail if e-mail is unavailable. If the deputy secretary denies the motion, the division shall determine whether to conduct a review under subsection (3)(b)(II) or (3)(b)(III) of this section. The determination by the deputy secretary under this subsection (4)(e)(II) is final agency action and is subject to judicial review by a state district court under section 24-4-106.

If the division determines that the respondent has failed to substantially comply under subsection (4)(f) of this section, the division shall conduct an additional review under subsection (5)(a) of this section to determine whether to file the complaint with a hearing officer.

In determining whether an entity substantially complied with its legal obligations under article XXVIII, this article 45, or the rules the division must consider:

The extent of the respondent's noncompliance;

The purpose of the provision violated and whether that purpose was substantially achieved despite the noncompliance; and

Whether the noncompliance may properly be viewed as an intentional attempt to mislead the electorate or election officials.

If the division determines that the respondent failed to cure any alleged deficiency, the division shall conduct an additional review under subsection (5)(a) of this section to determine whether to file a complaint with a hearing officer.

Investigations and enforcement.

The division shall investigate each complaint that was not dismissed during either its initial review or by means of the cure proceedings in accordance with subsection (3) or (4) of this section to determine whether to file a complaint with a hearing officer. The division may also initiate an investigation under subsection (7)(b) of this section.

For the purpose of an investigation relating to a complaint filed under subsection (2)(a) of this section or an investigation initiated by the division under subsection (7)(b) of this section, the division may request the production of any documents or other tangible things that are believed to be relevant or material to the investigation, and shall establish the relevance and materiality in writing. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, documents or other tangible things provided to the division during the course of an investigation under this subsection (5) are not subject to inspection or copying under the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, documents or other tangible things provided to the division during the course of an investigation under this subsection (5) and other materials prepared or assembled to assist the secretary's designee in reaching a decision are work product as defined in section 24-72-202 (6.5)(a) and are not public records subject to inspection under part 2 of article 72 of title 24.

If the division receives a person's membership list or donor list during the course of the division's initial review under subsection (3) of this section, investigation under this subsection (5), or the cure process, including the determination of substantial compliance, as described in subsection (4) of this section, the division shall not disclose such list or the identity of any member or donor to any person. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any such membership or donor list is not a public record subject to inspection, copying, or any other form of reproduction under part 2 of article 72 of title 24.

The division shall determine whether it will file a complaint with a hearing officer within thirty days after initiating an investigation. If the division makes a determination that a complaint should not be filed with a hearing officer because there is not sufficient information to support the allegations contained in the complaint or for any other reason, it shall prepare and file with the deputy secretary a motion to dismiss the complaint. The deputy secretary shall make a determination on the motion to dismiss within thirty-five days of the initial determination of the division under this subsection (5)(a)(IV), or the initiation of an investigation by the division under subsection (7)(b) of this section, which must be provided to the complainant and the respondent by e-mail or by regular mail if e-mail is unavailable. If the deputy secretary denies the motion, the division has fourteen business days to file a complaint with a hearing officer under this subsection (5).

If the division files a complaint with a hearing officer under this subsection (5), it is responsible for conducting such discovery as may be necessary for effectively prosecuting the complaint, supplementing or amending the complaint with such additional or alternative claims or allegations as may be supported by the division's investigation, amending the complaint to strike allegations or claims that are not supported by the division's investigation, and in all other respects prosecuting the complaint.

A complainant or any other nonrespondent is not a party to the division's initial review, cure proceedings, investigation, or any proceedings before a hearing officer as described in this section. A complainant may seek permission from the hearing officer to file a brief as an amicus curiae. A person's status as a complainant is not sufficient to establish that he or she may be affected or aggrieved by the secretary's action on the complaint. To the extent this subsection (5)(b) conflicts in any respect with section 24-4-105 or 24-4-106, this subsection (5)(b) controls. A complainant may also seek judicial review by a state district court of a final agency action under section 24-4-106.

Conduct of hearings.

Any hearing conducted by a hearing officer under this section must be in accordance with section 24-4-105; except that a hearing officer shall schedule a hearing within thirty days of the filing of the complaint, which hearing may be continued upon the motion of any party for up to thirty days or a longer extension of time upon a showing of good cause.

Any initial determination made by a hearing officer must be made in accordance with section 24-4-105 and is subject to review by the deputy secretary. The final agency decision is subject to review under section 24-4-106.

Document review.

In addition to any other powers and duties it possesses under law, the division may also review any document the secretary receives for filing under article XXVIII, this article 45, or the rules.

In connection with the review of other available information regarding a potential violation under this subsection (7):

If the division determines that a person violated or potentially violated any of the provisions of article XXVIII, this article 45, or the rules, the division shall either notify the person of his or her opportunity to cure the identified deficiencies in accordance with subsection (4) of this section or notify the person that the division is initiating an investigation under subsection (5) of this section. The division shall send the notification by e-mail or by regular mail if e-mail is unavailable.

If the division initiates an investigation or files a complaint with a hearing officer in connection with its review, the procedures described in subsections (5) and (6) of this section apply.

As used in this subsection (7), "review" means the factual inspection of any document required to be filed with the secretary for campaign finance registration, reporting, or disclosure in order to assess the document's accuracy and completeness and the timeliness of the document's filing.

Advisory opinions.

Any person seeking guidance on the application of article XXVIII, this article 45, or the rules may request that the secretary issue an advisory opinion regarding that person's specific activity.

The secretary shall determine, at the secretary's discretion, whether to issue an advisory opinion under subsection (8)(a) of this section. In making this determination, the secretary shall consider factors including whether:

The advisory opinion will terminate a controversy or remove one or more uncertainties as to the application of the law to the requestor's situation;

The request involves a subject, question, or issue that concerns a formal or informal matter or investigation currently pending before the secretary or a court; and

The request seeks a ruling on a moot or hypothetical question.

A person may rely on an advisory opinion issued by the secretary as an affirmative defense to any complaint filed under this section.

A refusal by the secretary to issue an advisory opinion does not constitute a final agency action that is subject to appeal.

Miscellaneous matters - debt collection - municipal complaints.

The secretary may pursue collection of any outstanding debt resulting from a campaign finance penalty that the secretary deems collectible.

Any complaint arising out of a municipal campaign finance matter must be exclusively filed with the clerk of the applicable municipality.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-232), ch. 330, p. 3059, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(9)(a) amended, (SB 21-055), ch. 12, p. 75, § 2, effective March 21.

1-45-112. Duties of municipal clerk.

The municipal clerk shall:

Develop a filing and indexing system for their offices consistent with the purposes of this article;

Keep a copy of any report or statement required to be filed by this article for a period of one year from the date of filing. In the case of candidates who were elected, those candidate's reports and filings shall be kept for one year after the candidate leaves office;

Make reports and statements filed under this article available to the public for inspection and copying no later than the end of the next business day after the date of filing. No information copied from such reports and statements shall be sold or used by any person for the purpose of soliciting contributions or for any commercial purpose.

Upon request by the secretary of state, transmit records and statements filed under this article to the secretary of state;

Notify any person under their jurisdiction who has failed to fully comply with the provisions of this article and notify any person if a complaint has been filed with the secretary of state alleging a violation of this article.

Repealed.

The secretary of state shall reimburse the municipal clerk of each municipality at the rate of two dollars per candidate per election to help defray the cost of implementing this article.

Source:

Initiated 96:

Entire article R&RE, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, January 15, 1997.

L. 2008:

(1)(f) repealed, p. 350, § 2, effective April 10.

L. 2009:

IP(1) and (2) amended, (HB 09-1357), ch. 361, p. 1874, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-45-115 as it existed prior to 1996.

1-45-112.5. Immunity from liability.

Any individual volunteering his or her time on behalf of a candidate or candidate committee shall be immune from any liability for a fine or penalty imposed pursuant to section 10 (1) of article XXVIII of the state constitution in any proceeding that is based on an act or omission of such volunteer if:

The volunteer was acting in good faith and within the scope of such volunteer's official functions and duties for the candidate or candidate committee; and

The violation was not caused by willful and intentional misconduct by such volunteer.

Subsection (1) of this section shall be administered in a manner that is consistent with section 1 of article XXVIII of the state constitution and with the legislative declaration set forth in section 1-45-102.

Any media outlet shall be immune from civil liability in any court where the media outlet:

Withdraws advertising time reserved by an independent expenditure committee that fails to register in accordance with the requirements of section 1-45-107.5 (3)(a); or

Elects to void an advertising contract and the advertisement:

Is paid for by an independent expenditure committee that fails to register under section 1-45-107.5 (3)(a);

Is paid for by an independent expenditure committee that is registered under section 1-45-107.5 (3)(a) but the committee fails to file a disclosure report under section 1-45-108 (2) through the date of the most recent required report; or

Fails to satisfy the requirements of section 1-45-107.5 (5)(a).

An affected media outlet may void a contract that implicates paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section in the sole discretion of the media outlet.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 2160, § 6, effective June 3.

L. 2010:

(3) and (4) added, (SB 10-203), ch. 269, p. 1237, § 7, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act adding subsections (3) and (4), see section 1 of chapter 269, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

1-45-113. Sanctions. (Repealed)

Source:

Initiated 96:

Entire article R&RE, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, January 15, 1997.

L. 98:

(6) added, p. 633, § 3, effective May 6; (6) added, p. 952, § 4, effective May 27.

L. 2000:

(1), (2), (3), and (4) amended, p. 127, § 9, effective March 15.

L. 2001:

(4) amended, p. 1110, § 1, effective September 1.

Initiated 2002:

Entire section repealed, effective upon proclamation of the Governor (see editor's note, (2)).

1-45-114. Expenditures - political advertising - rates and charges.

No candidate shall pay to any radio or television station, newspaper, periodical, or other supplier of materials or services a higher charge than that normally required for local commercial customers for comparable use of space, materials, or services. Any such rate shall not be rebated, directly or indirectly.

Any radio or television station, newspaper, or periodical that charges a candidate committee a lower rate for use of space, materials, or services than the rate such station, newspaper, periodical, or supplier charges another candidate committee for the same public office for comparable use of space, materials, or services shall report the difference in such rate as a contribution to the candidate committee that is charged such lower rate pursuant to section 1-45-108.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent an adjustment in rates related to frequency, volume, production costs, and agency fees if such adjustments are offered consistently to other advertisers.

Source:

Initiated 96:

Entire article R&RE, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, January 15, 1997.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 128, § 10, effective March 15.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2160, § 5, effective June 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-45-118 as it existed prior to 1996.

1-45-115. Encouraging withdrawal from campaign prohibited.

No person shall offer or give any candidate or candidate committee any money or any other thing of value for the purpose of encouraging the withdrawal of the candidate's candidacy, nor shall any candidate offer to withdraw a candidacy in return for money or any other thing of value.

Source:

Initiated 96:

Entire article R&RE, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, January 15, 1997.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-45-119 as it existed prior to 1996.

1-45-116. Home rule counties and municipalities.

Any home rule county or municipality may adopt ordinances or charter provisions with respect to its local elections that are more stringent than any of the provisions contained in this act. Any home rule county or municipality which adopts such ordinances or charter provisions shall not be entitled to reimbursement pursuant to subsection 1-45-112 (2). The requirements of article XXVIII of the state constitution and of this article shall not apply to home rule counties or home rule municipalities that have adopted charters, ordinances, or resolutions that address the matters covered by article XXVIII and this article.

Source:

Initiated 96:

Entire article R&RE, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, January 15, 1997.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2161, § 7, effective June 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-45-120 (1) as it existed prior to 1996.